Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,101
Recorded brand; owner; copies of record.

The owner of a recorded brand is entitled to one certified copy of the record of such brand from the Nebraska Brand Committee without charge. Additional certified copies of the record may be obtained by anyone upon the payment of one dollar for each copy.

Copies of any other document of the brand committee may be requested, and a fee of one dollar shall be collected for each page copied. Only personnel authorized by the brand committee shall make copies and collect such fees. The party requesting the copies is responsible for payment of the fee and shall reimburse the brand committee for the research time necessary to furnish the requested documents at a rate of not less than twenty nor more than forty dollars per hour of research time. The rate shall be reviewed and set annually by the brand committee.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 32;

Laws 2021, LB572, § 19.
August 28, 2021